ru: Место установки выхлопа: Спереди; От передней до средней части; По всей длине; Слева; Пара (слева и справа); Посередине; От средней до задней части; Сзади; Справа; Другое
sk-SK: Montážna poloha výfuku: Vpredu; Spredu do stredu; Po celej dĺžke; Vľavo; Ľavý a pravý pár; Stred; Zo stredu dozadu; Vzadu; Vpravo; Iné
bg-BG: Позиция за монтаж на ауспуха: Отпред; Отпред до средата; По цялата дължина; Отляво; Ляв и десен чифт; В средата; От средата до отзад; Отзад; Отдясно; Други
sv: Avgasinstallationsposition: Fram; Fram till mitten; Full längd; Vänster; Vänster och höger par; Mitten; Mitten till bak; Bak; Höger; Övrigt
de: Einbauposition der Abgasanlage: Vorne; Vorne bis Mitte; Volle Länge; Links; Linkes und rechtes Paar; Mitte; Mitte bis Hinten; Hinten; Rechts; Sonstiges
en: Exhaust installation position: Front; Front-to-mid; Full length; Left; Left & right pair; Mid; Mid-to-rear; Rear; Right; Other
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งท่อไอเสีย: ด้านหน้า; ด้านหน้าถึงช่วงกลาง; เต็มความยาว; ซ้าย; คู่ซ้ายขวา; ตรงกลาง; ช่วงกลางถึงด้านหลัง; ด้านหลัง; ขวา; อื่นๆ
hu: Kipufogórendszer beépítési helye: Elülső; Elölről középre; Teljes hosszúságú; Bal; Bal és jobb pár; Középső; Középről hátra; Hátsó; Jobb; Egyéb
pt-PT: Posição de instalação do escape: Frente; Frente a meio; Comprimento total; Esquerda; Par esquerdo e direito; Meio; Meio a traseira; Traseira; Direita; Outro
da: Udstødningens monteringsposition: Front; Front-til-midte; Fuld længde; Venstre; Venstre og højre par; Midte; Midte-til-bag; Bag; Højre; Andet
tr: Egzoz montaj konumu: Ön; Önden ortaya; Tam boy; Sol; Sol ve sağ çift; Orta; Ortadan arkaya; Arka; Sağ; Diğer
pl: Pozycja montażu układu wydechowego: Przód; Od przodu do środka; Pełna długość; Lewa; Para (lewa i prawa); Środek; Od środka do tyłu; Tył; Prawa; Inna
it: Posizione di installazione dello scarico: Anteriore; Anteriore-centrale; Lunghezza intera; Sinistra; Coppia sinistra e destra; Centrale; Centrale-posteriore; Posteriore; Destra; Altro
zh-TW: 排氣零件安裝位置: 前; 前至中; 全長; 左; 左右成對; 中; 中至後; 後; 右; 其他
es: Posición de instalación del escape: Frente; Frente a medio; Longitud completa; Izquierdo; Par izquierdo y derecho; Medio; Medio a trasero; Trasero; Derecho; Otra
lt-LT: Išmetimo sistemos montavimo padėtis: Priekyje; Nuo priekio iki vidurio; Per visą ilgį; Kairėje; Kairės ir dešinės pora; Viduryje; Nuo vidurio iki galo; Gale; Dešinėje; Kita
fr: Position d’installation de l’échappement: Avant; Avant-centre; Pleine longueur; Gauche; Paire gauche et droite; Centre; Centre-arrière; Arrière; Droite; Autre
fi: Pakoputken asennusasento: Edessä; Edestä keskelle; Koko pituus; Vasemmalla; Vasen ja oikea pari; Keskellä; Keskeltä taakse; Takana; Oikealla; Muu
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt khí thải: Trước; Trước đến giữa; Toàn chiều dài; Trái; Cặp trái và phải; Giữa; Giữa đến sau; Sau; Phải; Khác
zh-CN: 排气管安装位置: 前部; 前至中部; 全长; 左侧; 左右成对; 中部; 中至后部; 后部; 右侧; 其他
pt-BR: Posição de instalação do escapamento: Dianteira; Da dianteira para o meio; Comprimento total; Esquerda; Par esquerdo e direito; Meio; Do meio para a traseira; Traseira; Direita; Outros
el: Θέση εγκατάστασης εξάτμισης: Εμπρός; Εμπρός προς τη μέση; Πλήρους μήκους; Αριστερά; Ζεύγος αριστερά και δεξιά; Μέση; Μέση προς πίσω; Πίσω; Δεξιά; Άλλο
ko: 배기 장치 설치 위치: 전면; 전면-중앙; 전체 길이; 왼쪽; 좌우 쌍; 중앙; 중앙-후면; 후면; 오른쪽; 기타
hr-HR: Položaj ugradnje ispuha: Sprijeda; Od sprijeda do sredine; Puna duljina; Lijevo; Lijevi i desni par; U sredini; Od sredine prema natrag; Straga; Desno; Ostalo
nb: Monteringsposisjon for eksosanlegg: Foran; Foran til midten; Full lengde; Venstre; Venstre og høyre par; Midten; Midten til bak; Bak; Høyre; Annet
ro-RO: Poziția de instalare a evacuării: Față; Față-mijloc; Lungime completă; Stânga; Pereche stânga și dreapta; Mijloc; Mijloc-spate; Spate; Dreapta; Altele
nl: Uitlaat montagepositie: Voorzijde; Voor naar midden; Volledige lengte; Links; Paar links en rechts; Midden; Midden naar achter; Achter; Rechts; Overig
cs: Umístění výfuku: Přední; Zepředu do středu; Po celé délce; Levé; Levý a pravý pár; Středové; Ze středu dozadu; Zadní; Pravé; Jiné
sl-SI: Položaj namestitve izpušnega sistema: Spredaj; Od spredaj do sredine; Polna dolžina; Levo; Levi in desni par; Sredina; Od sredine do zadaj; Zadaj; Desno; Drugo
ja: 排気管の取り付け位置: フロント; フロント〜ミッド; 全長; 左; 左右ペア; ミッド; ミッド〜リア; リア; 右; その他